lt-LT: Iškarpų dydžių sistema: AU / NZ; ES; Tarptautinė; Kelių sistemų; JK; JAV; Kita
bg-BG: Система за оразмеряване на кройки: AU/NZ; EU; Международна; Множество системи; UK; US; Друго
pt-PT: Sistema de dimensionamento de moldes: AU/NZ; UE; Internacional; Vários sistemas; Reino Unido; EUA; Outro
fr: Système de tailles du patron: AU/NZ; UE; International; Systèmes multiples; UK; US; Autre
pt-BR: Molde sistema de tamanhos: AU/NZ; UE; Internacional; Vários sistemas; UK; EUA; Outro
fi: Kuvioiden kokojärjestelmä: AU/NZ; EU; Kansainvälinen; Useita järjestelmiä; UK; US; Muu
nb: Mønsterets størrelsessystem: AU/NZ; EU; Internasjonalt; Flere systemer; UK; US; Annet
sk-SK: Systém veľkostí strihu: AU/NZ; EÚ; Medzinárodné; Viacero systémov; UK; US; Iné
hr-HR: Sustav veličine uzorka: AU/NZ; EU; Međunarodno; Više sustava; UK; US; Ostalo
tr: Kalıp boyutlandırma sistemi: AU/NZ; EU; Uluslararası; Birden fazla sistem; UK; ABD; Diğer
el: Σύστημα μεγέθους μοτίβων: AU/NZ; ΕΕ; Διεθνές; Πολλαπλά συστήματα; ΗΒ; ΗΠΑ; Άλλο
nl: Patroon maatsysteem: AU/NZ; EU; Internationaal; Meerdere systemen; UK; US; Overig
da: Mønsterets størrelsessystem: AU/NZ; EU; International; Flere systemer; UK; US; Andet
vi: Hệ thống định cỡ mẫu: AU/NZ; EU; Quốc tế; Nhiều hệ thống; Vương quốc Anh; US; Khác
zh-TW: 紙樣尺寸系統: 澳洲/紐西蘭; 歐盟; 國際; 多重系統; 英國; 美國; 其他
pl: System rozmiarów wykroju: AU/NZ; EU; Międzynarodowa; Wiele systemów; UK; US; Inne
th: ระบบการกำหนดขนาดแพทเทิร์น: AU/NZ; EU; สากล; หลายระบบ; UK; US; อื่นๆ
ru: Система размеров выкройки: AU/NZ; EU; Международная; Несколько систем; UK; US; Другое
hu: Szabásminta méretezési rendszere: AU/NZ; EU; Nemzetközi; Többféle rendszer; UK; US; Egyéb
sl-SI: Sistem velikosti krojev: AU/NZ; EU; Mednarodno; Več sistemov; UK; US; Drugo
zh-CN: 纸样尺寸体系: 澳大利亚/新西兰; 欧盟; 国际; 多系统; 英国; 美国; 其他
en: Pattern sizing system: AU/NZ; EU; International; Multiple systems; UK; US; Other
es: Sistema de tallas de patrones: AU/NZ; UE; Internacional; Múltiples sistemas; Reino Unido; EE. UU.; Otro
ja: パターンサイズシステム: AU/NZ; EU; インターナショナル; 複数のシステム; UK; US; その他
sv: Storlekssystem för mönster: AU/NZ; EU; Internationell; Flera system; UK; US; Övrigt
it: Sistema di taglie del modello: AU/NZ; UE; Internazionale; Sistemi multipli; Regno Unito; US; Altro
de: Größensystem des Schnittmusters: AU/NZ; EU; International; Mehrere Systeme; UK; US; Sonstige
cs: Systém dimenzování vzorů: AU/NZ; EU; Mezinárodní; Více systémů; UK; US; Ostatní
ro-RO: Sistem de dimensionare a modelelor: AU/NZ; EU; Internațional; Sisteme multiple; UK; US; Altele
ko: 패턴 사이즈 체계: AU/NZ; EU; 인터내셔널; 다중 시스템; UK; US; 기타